District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-236

Appropriations.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-278, § 7, 48 DCR 1869
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7012, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7012 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7012 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).